Illinois, session 104th, HB2942.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-107 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-107)7    Sec. 6-107. Graduated license. 8    (a) The purpose of the Graduated Licensing Program is to 9develop safe and mature driving habits in young, inexperienced 10drivers and reduce or prevent motor vehicle crashes, 11fatalities, and injuries by:12        (1) providing for an increase in the time of practice 13    period before granting permission to obtain a driver's 14    license;15        (2) strengthening driver licensing and testing 16    standards for persons under the age of 21 years;17        (3) sanctioning driving privileges of drivers under 18    age 21 who have committed serious traffic violations or 19    other specified offenses; and20        (4) setting stricter standards to promote the public's 21    health and safety.22    (b) The application of any person under the age of 18 23years, and not legally emancipated, for a driver's license or   HB2942- 2 -LRB104 06384 LNS 16420 b1permit to operate a motor vehicle issued under the laws of this 2State, shall be accompanied by the written consent of either 3parent of the applicant; otherwise by the guardian having 4custody of the applicant, or in the event there is no parent or 5guardian, then by another responsible adult. The written 6consent must accompany any application for a driver's license 7under this subsection (b), regardless of whether or not the 8required written consent also accompanied the person's 9previous application for an instruction permit. 10    No graduated driver's license shall be issued to any 11applicant under 18 years of age, unless the applicant is at 12least 16 years of age and has:13        (1) Held a valid instruction permit for a minimum of 9 14    months.15        (2) Passed an approved driver education course and 16    submits proof of having passed the course as may be 17    required.18        (3) Certification by the parent, legal guardian, or 19    responsible adult that the applicant has had a minimum of 20    50 hours of behind-the-wheel practice time, at least 10 21    hours of which have been at night, and is sufficiently 22    prepared and able to safely operate a motor vehicle.23    (b-1) No graduated driver's license shall be issued to any 24applicant who is under 18 years of age and not legally 25emancipated, unless the applicant has graduated from a 26secondary school of this State or any other state, is enrolled   HB2942- 3 -LRB104 06384 LNS 16420 b1in a course leading to a State of Illinois High School Diploma, 2has obtained a State of Illinois High School Diploma, is 3enrolled in an elementary or secondary school or college or 4university of this State or any other state and is not a 5chronic or habitual truant as provided in Section 26-2a of the 6School Code, or is receiving home instruction and submits 7proof of meeting any of those requirements at the time of 8application. 9    An applicant under 18 years of age who provides proof 10acceptable to the Secretary that the applicant has resumed 11regular school attendance or home instruction or that his or 12her application was denied in error shall be eligible to 13receive a graduated license if other requirements are met. The 14Secretary shall adopt rules for implementing this subsection 15(b-1). 16    (c) No graduated driver's license or permit shall be 17issued to any applicant under 18 years of age who has committed 18the offense of operating a motor vehicle without a valid 19license or permit in violation of Section 6-101 of this Code or 20a similar out of state offense and no graduated driver's 21license or permit shall be issued to any applicant under 18 22years of age who has committed an offense that would otherwise 23result in a mandatory revocation of a license or permit as 24provided in Section 6-205 of this Code or who has been either 25convicted of or adjudicated a delinquent based upon a 26violation of the Cannabis Control Act, the Illinois Controlled   HB2942- 4 -LRB104 06384 LNS 16420 b1Substances Act, the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, or the 2Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act while 3that individual was in actual physical control of a motor 4vehicle. For purposes of this Section, any person placed on 5probation under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, 6Section 410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 7Section 70 of the Methamphetamine Control and Community 8Protection Act shall not be considered convicted. Any person 9found guilty of such an offense, while in actual physical 10control of a motor vehicle, shall have an entry made in the 11court record by the judge that the offense did occur while the 12person was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle and 13order the clerk of the court to report the violation to the 14Secretary of State as such.15    (d) No graduated driver's license shall be issued for 9 16months to any applicant under the age of 18 years who has 17committed and subsequently been convicted of an offense 18against traffic regulations governing the movement of 19vehicles, any violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 of 20this Code, or who has received a disposition of court 21supervision for a violation of Section 6-20 of the Illinois 22Liquor Control Act of 1934 or a similar provision of a local 23ordinance.24    (e) No graduated driver's license holder under the age of 2518 years shall operate any motor vehicle, except a motor 26driven cycle or motorcycle, with more than one passenger in   HB2942- 5 -LRB104 06384 LNS 16420 b1the front seat of the motor vehicle and no more passengers in 2the back seats than the number of available seat safety belts 3as set forth in Section 12-603 of this Code. If a graduated 4driver's license holder over the age of 18 committed an 5offense against traffic regulations governing the movement of 6vehicles or any violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 7of this Code in the 6 months prior to the graduated driver's 8license holder's 18th birthday, and was subsequently convicted 9of the violation, the provisions of this paragraph shall 10continue to apply until such time as a period of 6 consecutive 11months has elapsed without an additional violation and 12subsequent conviction of an offense against traffic 13regulations governing the movement of vehicles or any 14violation of this Section or Section 12-603.1 of this Code. 15    (f) (Blank). 16    (g) If a graduated driver's license holder is under the 17age of 18 when he or she receives the license, for the first 12 18months he or she holds the license or until he or she reaches 19the age of 18, whichever occurs sooner, the graduated license 20holder may not operate a motor vehicle with more than one 21passenger in the vehicle who is under the age of 20, unless any 22additional passenger or passengers are siblings, 23step-siblings, children, or stepchildren of the driver. If a 24graduated driver's license holder is convicted of operating a 25motor vehicle with more than one passenger in the vehicle who 26is under the age of 20, the graduated license shall be   HB2942- 6 -LRB104 06384 LNS 16420 b1suspended for 6 months. If a graduated driver's license holder 2committed an offense against traffic regulations governing the 3movement of vehicles or any violation of this Section or 4Section 12-603.1 of this Code during the first 12 months the 5license is held and subsequently is convicted of the 6violation, the provisions of this paragraph shall remain in 7effect until such time as a period of 6 consecutive months has 8elapsed without an additional violation and subsequent 9conviction of an offense against traffic regulations governing 10the movement of vehicles or any violation of this Section or 11Section 12-603.1 of this Code. 12    (h) It shall be an offense for a person that is age 15, but 13under age 20, to be a passenger in a vehicle operated by a 14driver holding a graduated driver's license during the first 1512 months the driver holds the license or until the driver 16reaches the age of 18, whichever occurs sooner, if another 17passenger under the age of 20 is present, excluding a sibling, 18step-sibling, child, or step-child of the driver. 19    (i) No graduated driver's license shall be issued to any 20applicant under the age of 18 years if the applicant has been 21issued a traffic citation for which a disposition has not been 22rendered at the time of application. 23(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 24103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)